New York, session 2025-2026, S4049.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 5 of the volunteer firefighters' 2 benefit law is amended by adding a new paragraph q to read as follows: 3 q. While, within the state, undergoing a full cancer screening, as 4 determined by the commissioner of health, upon entry of service to a 5 fire department or fire company and annually thereafter. The costs of 6 such full cancer screenings shall be borne entirely by the state. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03046-01-5